en: Aquarium filter features: Adjustable flow rate; Compact design; Media included; Multi-stage filtration; Quick cartridge change; Quiet operation; Self-priming; Other
zh-TW: 水族箱濾水器功能: 流速可調; 小巧設計; 含媒體; 多階段過濾; 快速更換墨水匣; 安靜運作; 自吸式; 其他
ro-RO: Caracteristici filtru pentru acvariu: Debit reglabil; Design compact; Materiale de filtrare incluse; Filtrare în mai multe etape; Schimbare rapida a cartușului; Funcționare silențioasă; Amorsare automată; Altele
pt-BR: Recursos do filtro de aquário: Fluxo ajustável; Design compacto; Mídia incluída; Filtração em vários estágios; Troca rápida de cartucho; Operação silenciosa; Autoescorvante; Outro
th: คุณลักษณะระบบกรองตู้ปลา: ปรับอัตราการไหลได้; การออกแบบที่กะทัดรัด; รวมสารกรองน้ำ; การกรองแบบหลายขั้นตอน; เปลี่ยนไส้กรองได้เร็ว; การทำงานที่เงียบ; มีรองพื้นในตัว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 水族箱过滤器特点: 可调流速; 紧凑型设计; 含过滤介质; 多级过滤; 快速更换滤芯; 无噪声; 自吸式; 其他
cs: Vlastnosti akvarijního filtru: Nastavitelný průtok; Kompaktní design; Včetně médií; Vícestupňová filtrace; Rychlá výměna kazety; Tichý provoz; Samonasávací; Jiné
it: Funzionalità del filtro dell'acquario: Portata regolabile; Design compatto; Contenuti multimediali inclusi; Filtrazione multistadio; Cambio rapido della cartuccia; Funzionamento silenzioso; Autoadescante; Altro
sv: Detaljer för akvariumfilter: Justerbar flödeshastighet; Kompakt design; Media ingår; Flerstegsfiltrering; Snabbt patronbyte; Tyst drift; Självsugande; Övrigt
pl: Charakterystyka filtra akwariowego: Regulowane natężenie przepływu; Kompaktowa konstrukcja; Materiały filtracyjne w zestawie; Wielostopniowa filtracja; Szybka wymiana wkładu; Ciche działanie; Samozasysanie; Inne
ko: 수족관 필터 기능: 조절식 유량; 컴팩트 디자인; 미디어 포함; 다단계 여과; 빠른 카트리지 교체; 조용한 작동; 자체 프라이밍; 기타
sk-SK: Funkcie akváriového filtra: Nastaviteľný prietok; Kompaktný dizajn; Vrátane médií; Viacstupňová filtrácia; Rýchla výmena kazety; Tichá prevádzka; Samonasávanie; Iné
nl: Functies van aquariumfilters: Instelbare stroomsnelheid; Compact ontwerp; Media inbegrepen; Meertrapsfiltratie; Snelle cartridgewissel; Stille werking; Zelfaanzuigend; Andere
ru: Характеристики фильтра для аквариумов: Регулируемая скорость потока; Компактный дизайн; С наполнителем; Многоступенчатая фильтрация; Быстрая смена картриджа; Тихая работа; Самовсасывающий; Другое
de: Funktionen des Aquariumfilters: Einstellbare Durchflussmenge; Kompaktes Design; Medien inklusive; Mehrstufige Filtration; Schneller Kartuschenwechsel; Leiser Betrieb; Selbstansaugend; Sonstiges
nb: Akvariumsfilterfunksjoner: Regulerbar strømningshastighet; Kompakt design; Media inkludert; Flertrinnsfiltrering; Rask patronbytte; Stillegående drift; Selvgruning; Annet
hu: Akváriumszűrő tulajdonságai: Állítható áramlási sebesség; Kompakt kialakítás; Szűrőanyagot tartalmazza; Többlépcsős szűrés; Gyors patroncsere; Csendes működés; Önfeltöltő; Egyéb
pt-PT: Características de filtro de aquário: Taxa de fluxo ajustável; Design compacto; Multimédia incluída; Filtração em várias fases; Troca rápida de cartucho; Operação silenciosa; Autopreparação; Outro
fi: Akvaarion suodattimen ominaisuudet: Säädettävä virtausnopeus; Kompakti muotoilu; Mukana media; Monivaiheinen suodatus; Nopea patruunan vaihto; Hiljainen toiminta; Itsepohjustava; Muu
hr-HR: Značajke filtra za akvarij: Podesiva brzina protoka; Kompaktni dizajn; Mediji uključeni; Višestupanjska filtracija; Brza izmjena uložaka; Tihi rad; Samousisni; Ostalo
ja: アクアリウムフィルターの特徴: 流量調整可能; コンパクトなデザイン; メディア付属; 多段ろ過; クイックカートリッジ交換; 静かな動作; 自吸式; その他
es: Características del filtro de acuario: Caudal regulable; Diseño compacto; Incluye medios; Filtración de múltiples etapas; Cambio rápido de cartucho; Funcionamiento silencioso; Cebado automático; Otros
fr: Caractéristiques du filtre d’aquarium: Débit réglable; Design compact; Support multimédia inclus; Filtration en plusieurs étapes; Changement de cartouche rapide; Fonctionnement silencieux; Auto-amorçage; Autre
vi: Tính năng lọc bể cá: Điều chỉnh được tốc độ dòng chảy; Thiết kế nhỏ gọn; Đã bao gồm phương tiện; Lọc nhiều giai đoạn; Thay hộp mực nhanh; Vận hành êm; Tự mồi; Khác
tr: Akvaryum filtresi özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir akış hızı; Kompakt tasarım; Medya dahil; Çok aşamalı filtreleme; Hızlı kartuş değişimi; Sessiz çalışma; Kendinden emişli; Diğer
lt-LT: Akvariumo filtro ypatybės: Reguliuojamas srautas; Kompaktiškas dizainas; Pristatoma su laikmena; Kelių pakopų filtravimas; Greitas kasetės keitimas; Tylus veikimas; Savaime užsipildantis; Kita
bg-BG: Характеристики на аквариумния филтър: Регулируем дебит; Компактен дизайн; Включени медии; Многостепенна филтрация; Бърза смяна на касетата; Тиха работа; Самозасмукващ; Други
el: Χαρακτηριστικά φίλτρου ενυδρείου: Ρυθμιζόμενη ταχύτητα ροής; Σχεδιασμός μικρών διαστάσεων; Περιλαμβάνονται μέσα; Φιλτράρισμα πολλαπλών σταδίων; Γρήγορη αλλαγή φυσιγγίου; Αθόρυβη λειτουργία; Αυτόματη πλήρωση; Άλλο
da: Filterfunktioner for akvarium: Justerbar flowhastighed; Kompakt design; Medier inkluderet; Flertrinsfiltrering; Hurtigt patronskift; Stille drift; Selvklargørende; Andet
sl-SI: Lastnosti akvarijskih filtrov: Nastavljiv pretok; Kompaktna zasnova; Mediji vključeni; Večstopenjska filtracija; Hitra menjava kartuš; Tiho delovanje; Samosesalno; Drugo